Arkansas, session 2025, HB1405.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-81-107(a), concerning the definitions
related to the use of a procurer by a chiropractic physician, is amended to
add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(3) "Solicit" means the initiation of in-person communication,
telemarketing communication, telephonic communication, text message
communication, internet direct message communication, or any other electronic
direct message communication, or any combination of communications, by a
chiropractic physician, including by his or her employee, agent, independent
contractor, or procurer.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-81-107(b), concerning the use of a
procurer by a chiropractic physician, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) A chiropractic physician who uses a procurer is required to:
*JMB307*
03-10-2025 14:05:07 JMB307

As Engrossed: H2/11/25 H2/18/25 H2/20/25 S3/10/25 HB1405
(A) Have a written contract with the procurer or
procurement company with whom the chiropractic physician engages; and
(B) Register the name of any each procurer with whom the
chiropractic physician contracts with the Arkansas State Board of
Chiropractic Examiners.
(2) A chiropractic physician shall register a procurer with the
board by filing the following information with the board on a form approved
by the board:
(A) The full legal name of the procurer with whom the
chiropractic physician has a current contract and engages;
(B) A valid state-issued photo identification or driver's
license, or both, of the procurer;
(C) The procurer's permanent home address;
(D) The procurer's business telephone number solely used
for client communication purposes or to make calls and send electronic text
messages to potential clients; and
(E) The name, telephone number, and address of the
chiropractic physician engaging or employing the procurer.
(3) The chiropractic physician shall provide the board with
updated procurer registration information, should any of the information
required under subdivision (b)(2) of this section change during the year.
(4)(A) The procurer registration expires on December 31 of each
year.
(B) If a chiropractic physician engages a procurer, the
chiropractic physician shall register the procurer annually.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 17-81-107(c), concerning violations for the
improper use of a procurer, is amended to read as follows:
(c) A violation of this section shall result in the following:
(1)(A) Any payments paid by, or on behalf of, an individual
named in a motor vehicle accident report for medical services provided by the
chiropractic physician to the individual named in a motor vehicle accident
report shall be returned to the individual, insurance company, or other
payor.
(B) The chiropractic physician shall pay reasonable
attorney's fees incurred by a person collecting the payments described in
03-10-2025 14:05:07 JMB307

As Engrossed: H2/11/25 H2/18/25 H2/20/25 S3/10/25 HB1405
subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section; and
(2) The prohibition of a chiropractic physician from attempting
to collect fees for medical services from an individual named in a motor
vehicle accident report;
(3) A fine in the amount of the five hundred dollars ($500) from
the board; and
(4)(A) A private civil action in any competent jurisdiction if
the person suffered a pecuniary loss because of the chiropractic physician's
violation of this section.
(B) A person who suffers pecuniary loss because of a
chiropractic physician and brings an action under subdivision (c)(4)(A) of
this section shall recover:
(i) The pecuniary loss caused by the violation;
(ii) Court costs;
(iii) Reasonable attorney's fee; and
(iv) The greater of:
(a) Five hundred dollars ($500); or
(b) Twice the amount of the pecuniary loss.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 17-81-107(d)(3)(B), concerning the
requirements of a procurer operating in this state, is amended to read as
follows:
(B) The records described in subdivision (d)(3)(A) of this
section shall include:
(i) The names and telephone numbers of individuals
solicited;
(ii) The name of the chiropractic physician with
whom the procurer has contracted as required under subsection (b) of this
section;
(iii) If solicitation with an individual is
initiated due to a motor vehicle accident, then the date and time of the
motor vehicle accident;
(iv) The amount of compensation paid to a procurer
for the solicitation of each actual or potential patient, customer, or
client; and
(v) The extent of any treatment or medical services
03-10-2025 14:05:07 JMB307

As Engrossed: H2/11/25 H2/18/25 H2/20/25 S3/10/25 HB1405
obtained by the individual; and
(vi) Any moneys shared by the procurer with other
persons for conducting work as a procurer;

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 17-81-107, concerning the use of a procurer
by a chiropractic physician, is amended to add additional subsections to read
as follows:
(i) A chiropractic physician, including his or her employee, agent,
independent contractor, or procurer, shall not solicit an individual who has
been involved in an accident, disaster, or other event that causes injury for
the purpose of treating injuries that the individual sustained or may have
sustained in the accident, disaster, or other event unless:
(1) The chiropractic physician has a family or prior
professional relationship with the individual; or
(2) The chiropractic physician solicits the individual more than
fourteen (14) days after the date of the motor vehicle accident.
(j) A chiropractic physician shall have solicited services if the
chiropractic physician performs services on an individual who is referred by:
(1) A procurer registered under this section of the chiropractic
physician; or
(2) Any person who receives compensation from the chiropractic
physician in consideration of referrals, regardless of the relationship
between the referring person and chiropractic physician.
(k) Direct solicitation of a person who is under eighteen (18) years
of age is prohibited.
(l) A chiropractic physician is liable for any representation made by
a procurer soliciting services on behalf of the chiropractic physician,
regardless of the existence of any written contract between the chiropractor
and a procurer, if:
(1) The chiropractic physician provides or has provided
compensation to the procurer for referrals; and
(2) A reasonable expectation exists that the procurer will be
compensated for referring individuals to the chiropractic physician.
(m) Solicitation conducted by a procurer shall not:
(1) Initiate from a telephone number other than the telephone
number registered with the board;
03-10-2025 14:05:07 JMB307

As Engrossed: H2/11/25 H2/18/25 H2/20/25 S3/10/25 HB1405
(2) Falsely state, imply, or otherwise communicate that:
(A) He or she has an affiliation with an insurance company
unless he or she is an authorized representative of an insurance company;
(B) Payment of an insurance claim or insurance coverage
will be available or otherwise affected by the individual's willingness to
see a specific chiropractic physician or healthcare provider;
(C) The Attorney General's Office, the board, or any other
regulatory or governmental agency has approved or is otherwise affiliated
with the procurer; or
(D) A specific medical facility is a preferred medical
clinic or in-network provider for any purpose;
(3) Offer or give anything of value or promise payment or gifts
of any kind in connection with a solicitation contact;
(4) Use a false name or identity during the solicitation;
(5) Provide or promise to provide a prescription or
nonprescription medication or medical supplies unless he or she is authorized
to prescribe and treat according to state law; or
(6) Make any other statement that is deceptive or misleading
within the context of a solicitation.
(n) This section does not prohibit:
(1) Solicitation by targeted direct-mail advertising or other
forms of written, radio, or television advertising, if the advertising does
not involve coercion, duress, or harassment and is not false, deceptive, or
misleading; or
(2) Advertisement of a chiropractic physician’s services by
website or any social media account if the chiropractic physician does not
use the website or social media account to solicit an individual in violation
of subdivision (i) of this section.

/s/J. Richardson






03-10-2025 14:05:07 JMB307